Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201371-1931
Separate license required; duties
of licensee.

(1)
An applicant for licensure under the Children's Residential Facilities and
Placing Licensure Act shall obtain a separate license for each type of residential
child-caring agency or child-placing agency that the applicant seeks to operate.
A single license may be issued for a residential child-caring agency operating
in separate buildings or structures on the same premises under one management.

(2) An applicant
for licensure shall obtain a separate license for each type of placement service
the applicant seeks to provide. When a child-placing agency has more than
one office location, the child-placing agency shall inform the department
of each office location and the services provided at each location. A single
license may be issued for multiple offices, or the applicant may apply for
individual licenses for each office location.

Laws 2013, LB265, § 8.